Wisconsin, session 2025, AB934.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the Department of Revenue and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of the bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.AB934,11Section 1. 66.1105 (2) (L) of the statutes is amended to read:AB934,2,3266.1105 (2) (L) “Taxable property” means all real and personal taxable 3property located in a tax incremental district.Note: Section 1 removes personal taxable property located in a tax incremental district from the definition of taxable property to define “taxable property” as all real taxable property in a tax incremental district.AB934,24Section 2. 71.10 (4) (i) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 5is amended to read:AB934,3,2671.10 (4) (i) The total of claim of right credit under s. 71.07 (1), farmland 7preservation credit under ss. 71.57 to 71.61, farmland preservation credit, 2010 and 8beyond under s. 71.613, homestead credit under subch. VIII, jobs tax credit under s. 971.07 (3q), business development credit under s. 71.07 (3y), research credit under s. 1071.07 (4k) (e) 2. a., film production services credit under s. 71.07 (5f) (b) 2., veterans 11and surviving spouses property tax credit under s. 71.07 (6e), enterprise zone jobs 12credit under s. 71.07 (3w), electronics and information technology manufacturing 13zone credit under s. 71.07 (3wm), earned income tax credit under s. 71.07 (9e), 1estimated tax payments under s. 71.09, and taxes withheld under subch. X, taxes 2withheld under s. 71.775, and deposits made under s. 71.80 (15) (c).Note: Section 2 adds, in the statute for computing tax liability for individuals and fiduciaries, cross-references to include pass-through withholdings and deposits made by nonresident entertainers.AB934,33Section 3. 71.30 (3) (f) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 4is amended to read:AB934,3,11571.30 (3) (f) The total of farmland preservation credit under subch. IX, jobs 6credit under s. 71.28 (3q), enterprise zone jobs credit under s. 71.28 (3w), electronics 7and information technology manufacturing zone credit under s. 71.28 (3wm), 8business development credit under s. 71.28 (3y), research credit under s. 71.28 (4) 9(k) 1., film production services credit under s. 71.28 (5f) (b) 2., and estimated tax 10payments under s. 71.29, taxes withheld under subch. X, taxes withheld under s. 1171.775, and deposits made under s. 71.80 (15) (c).Note: Section 3 adds, in the statute for computing tax liability for corporations, cross-references to include pass-through withholdings, deposits made by nonresident entertainers, and amounts withheld on account of corporations.AB934,412Section 4. 77.94 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 77.94 and amended to 13read:AB934,3,191477.94 Surcharge determination. Except as provided in sub. (2), the The 15surcharge imposed under s. 77.93 is an amount equal to the amount calculated by 16multiplying gross tax liability for the taxable year of the corporation by 3 percent, 17or in the case of a tax-option corporation an amount equal to the amount calculated 18by multiplying net income under s. 71.34 by 0.2 percent, up to a maximum of 19$9,800, or $25, whichever is greater.Note: Section 4 deletes a cross-reference to a method for computing a corporation’s special economic surcharge that is repealed in Section 5.AB934,520Section 5. 77.94 (2) of the statutes is repealed.Note: Section 5 repeals a method of computing a corporation’s special economic surcharge because it duplicates the simpler method described in Section 4.AB934,61Section 6. 565.01 (5) of the statutes is repealed.Note: Section 6 repeals a definition of “relative” that is not used in the statutory chapter, having been replaced with a definition of “immediate family member.”AB934,4,22